Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-14,107
Landlord, manager; relieved of liability; when.

(1) A landlord, who conveys a mobile home park in a good faith sale to a bona fide purchaser shall be relieved of liability under the rental agreement and the Mobile Home Landlord and Tenant Act as to events occurring subsequent to written notice to the tenant of the conveyance.

(2) A manager of a mobile home park shall be relieved of liability under the rental agreement and the Mobile Home Landlord and Tenant Act as to events occurring after written notice to the tenant of the termination of his or her management, except that such notice shall not terminate any agreement or legal liability arising prior to the notice.

Laws 1984, LB 916, § 58.